http://www.ca3.uscourts.gov/classcounsel/final%20report%20of%20third%20circuit%20task%20force.pdf

   Third Circuit Task Force Report Selection of Class Counsel I.
   Introduction A. The Promise and Challenge of Class Actions Courts have
   struggled with the challenges of managing class actions. One
   significant concern has been selecting appropriate counsel to litigate
   cases on behalf of the class; another has been the awarding of fair
   attorney fees. Courts also review the credentials of the lead plaintiff
   according to the standards of Fed. R. Civ. P. 23, in particular the
   requirement that the "representative parties will fairly and adequately
   protect the interests of the class."1 Traditionally the choice of lead
   plaintiff constituted the choice of lead counsel, and the court awarded
   fees to class counsel at the end of the case in light of the result.
   Recently two developments have altered the class action landscape: the
   use of judicial auctions to select class counsel2 and the enactment of
   the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act ("PSLRA").3 The Third
   Circuit has been in the vanguard in the management of class actions in
   both its jurisprudence and its study.4 In that tradition, Chief Judge
   Edward R. Becker convened the present 1 Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(a). 2 Some
   commentators refer to "auctions" only as they relate to an auction of a
   class claim. We use the term "auction" here as synonymous with bidding
   for an appointment as lead counsel  i.e., where counsel seeking to be
   named class counsel compete with each other through a bidding process
   monitored by a judge. We note that courts have used the term "auction"
   as we do, in reference to judicially-controlled bidding for appointment
   of class counsel. See, e.g., In re Cendant Corp. Litig., 264 F.3d 201,
   270-71 (3d Cir. 2001) (reviewing "the District Court's decision to
   employ an auction to select lead counsel"). 3 15 U.S.C. § 78u-4(a)(3).
   4 Lindy Bros. Builders, Inc. of Philadelphia v. American Radiator &
   Standard Sanitary Corp., 487 F.2d 161 (3d Cir. 1973), appeal following
   remand, 540 F.2d 102 (3d Cir. 1976); In re Cendant Corp. Prides Litig.,
   243 F. 3d 722 ( 3d Cir. 2001); In re Cendant Corp. Litig., 264 F.3d 201
   (3d Cir. 2001). In 1985, then Chief Judge Ruggiero J. Aldisert convened
   a Task Force to study the question of how attorney fees should be
   awarded in class actions. Its report, Court 1 Task Force on the
   Selection of Class Counsel to evaluate the emerging practice of several
   district court judges throughout the country of selecting class counsel
   and setting fees through a bidding or auction process, and to
   investigate more generally the problems involved in selection of class
   counsel. The redrafting of Rule 23 in 1966 opened the door more widely
   to class actions seeking damages arising from harms to multiple
   individuals or entities in a variety of contexts. The drafters
   recognized that it was inefficient, impractical and often impossible
   for injured persons with small claims to bring lawsuits to recover
   damages, no matter how strong their claims. Justice Ginsburg's opinion
   for the Supreme Court in Amchem Products, Inc. v. Windsor,5 cited a
   Seventh Circuit decision describing the function of most class actions
   seeking money damages pursuant to Rule 23 (b)(3): The policy at the
   very core of the class action mechanism is to overcome the problem that
   small recoveries do not provide the incentive for any individual to
   bring a solo action prosecuting his or her rights. A class action
   solves this problem by aggregating the relatively paltry potential
   recoveries into something worth someone's (usually an attorney's)
   labor. Mace v. Van Ru Credit Corp., 109 F.3d 338, 344 (1997). The
   drafters also foresaw that, even where damages might be substantial
   enough to provide an incentive for litigation, multiple lawsuits
   raising very similar questions of fact and mixed questions of fact and
   law could drain scarce judicial resources and might do no more justice
   than a single suit brought on behalf of all who would have the right to
   file individual actions. What was thought to be true in 1966 appears to
   be true today: namely, that the interests of justice are well served by
   class actions that vindicate rights that might otherwise go unprotected
   and that spare courts the burden of handling numerous lawsuits, some
   small and some not so small, arising from a common set of facts. Over
   the last 35 years, the American legal system has handled a variety of
   class actions involving an enormous array of claims. In many
   situations, the class action has been successful in identifying public
   harms, discovering a substantial percentage of likely victims, making
   the party responsible for the harm rectify much of the damage caused,
   and distributing damages among the injured parties. B. Funding and
   Prosecution of Class Actions Awarded Attorney Fees, Report of the Third
   Circuit Task Force, 108 F.R.D. 237 (1985), has been very influential in
   the development of the law and procedures for managing attorney fees in
   class actions. 5 521 U.S. 591, 617 (1997). 2 Class actions are
   generated and funded in a number of ways. Some class actions are
   brought through the efforts of public interest advocacy groups; these
   actions usually involve constitutional and civil rights claims e.g.,
   school desegregation suits, employment discrimination actions, and
   challenges to statutes, regulations and ordinances on free speech
   grounds. Such groups may be funded by members, supported by
   contributors, or both. They may use in-house counsel who are paid a
   salary, outside counsel who often receive nothing unless they are
   successful in bringing suit so that attorney fees may be sought
   pursuant to statute, or a combination. The reported decisions and
   anecdotal reports of judges and lawyers in these cases suggest that it
   is relatively rare for there to be a fight among lawyers for
   appointment as lead counsel. The motivating force in these cases is
   vindication of principle. The prospect of attorney fees may be an
   incentive  in some cases, an important one  for groups or lawyers to
   risk their time and effort on such a case. But, the possibility that
   attorney fees might be awarded appears not to be the driving force for
   either the groups who bring suit or their lawyers. It is the principle
   at stake that drives the case. Those who share a belief in the
   principle are more likely to assist the litigation than to compete with
   it. In other cases, particularly those in which injured parties have
   suffered a financial injury, the desire to be made whole may be as
   strongly held as principles that drive other litigation, but there is
   no public interest group or other not-for-profit entity volunteering to
   seek recourse on behalf of those who are injured. Instead, the injured
   find that justice depends on the availability of plaintiffs' counsel of
   sufficient experience, skill, and resources. It is the plaintiffs' bar,
   and particularly the plaintiffs' class action bar, that provides the
   legal representation that enables large groups of people to vindicate
   their right to legal redress for wrongs inflicted upon them. It does
   not impugn the service that the plaintiffs' class action bar provides
   to note that the driving force in most cases is the opportunity to
   share in the plaintiffs' risk and ultimately in any reward they may
   receive. Like most prudent individuals, plaintiffs' counsel would not
   seek involvement in most class action cases, particularly those
   involving no principle greater than "the defendant wrongly deprived me
   of something of value," unless the financial reward justified the risk
   that counsel undertakes. Because they have abilities that could be put
   to other uses, plaintiffs' counsel must find something in a class
   action that signals that it is financially attractive to be class
   counsel.6 It is plaintiffs' counsel who pay the expenses of the
   lawsuit, and who expect that they will lose much if not all of their
   out-of-pocket expenses if they are not ultimately successful in having
   a court certify a class and achieving either a settlement or a
   litigation victory.7 It is plaintiffs' counsel 6 See, e.g., John C.
   Coffee, The Regulation of Entrepreneurial Litigation: Balancing
   Fairness and Efficiency in the Large Class Action, 54 U. CHI. L. REV.
   877 (1987) (describing and noting the need for economic incentives for
   plaintiffs' lawyers in common fund class actions). 7Advancing expenses
   and court costs, the repayment of which are contingent on the outcome
   of the litigation, is permitted by Rule 1.8(e), Model Rules of
   Professional Conduct. 3 who work to obtain whatever recovery any member
   of the class who has not opted out of the litigation will receive.8 The
   fact that there will be no payment if there is no settlement or trial
   victory means that there is greater risk for plaintiffs' counsel in
   these class action cases than in cases in which an hourly rate or flat
   fee is guaranteed. The quid pro quo for the risk, and for the delay in
   receiving any compensation in the best of circumstances, is some kind
   of risk premium if the case is successful. C. Perceptions About Common
   Fund Class Actions The cases upon which the Task Force has focused are
   common fund cases. These are cases in which plaintiffs obtain class
   action certification and generate a pool of damages by way of
   settlement or litigation with one or more defendants. The larger the
   pool, the more each plaintiff might receive  depending, of course, on
   what the lawyers receive from the same pool. The lawyers expect
   compensation from the fund for creating it, as well as a risk premium
   for bearing all of the financial risks in the litigation.9 The Task
   Force is well aware that there is a perception among a significant part
   of the non- lawyer population and even among lawyers and judges that
   the risk premium is too high in class Most states follow that Rule.
   Stephen Gillers and Roy D. Simon, REGULATION OF LAWYERS: STATUTES AND
   STANDARDS, pp.101-07 (2001). (But see New York Code of Professional
   Responsibility D.R.5-103(b)(1), codified at 22
   N.Y.C.R.R.§1200.22(b)(1), requiring that the client remain ultimately
   liable for such expenses). The ABA Ethics 2000 project proposes to add
   a comment to the Model Rule stating: "[A] prohibition on a lawyer
   lending a client court costs and litigation expenses [is not
   warranted], because these advances are virtually indistinguishable from
   contingent fees and help ensure access to the courts." 8 See Jill E.
   Fisch, Aggregations, Auctions and Other Developments in the Selection
   of Lead Counsel Under the PSLRA, 64 LAW & CONTEMP. PROBS. 53, 56
   (2001): Lawyer-driven litigation is not inherently undesirable. The
   willingness of plaintiffs' lawyers to investigate potential causes of
   action, mobilize the plaintiff class, and bear the costs and risks
   associated with the suit leads to an increase in enforcement and
   provides a valuable contribution to the deterrence of corporate
   misconduct. Indeed, by providing suitable financial incentives for
   these activities, class actions have led to the evolution of
   entrepreneurial plaintiffs' lawyers, who play a central role in
   rendering the class action a meaningful vehicle for compensating
   victims and deterring wrongful conduct. 9 "The common-fund doctrine ...
   allows a person who maintains a lawsuit that results in the creation,
   preservation, or increase of a fund in which others have a common
   interest, to be reimbursed from that fund for litigation expenses
   incurred." Court Awarded Attorney Fees, Report of the Third Circuit
   Task Force, 108 F.R.D. 237, 241 (1985). 4 action cases and that class
   action plaintiffs' lawyers are overcompensated for the work that they
   do. This perception is fostered by a belief that class action lawyers
   receive 25% to 33 % of the recovery in common fund cases irrespective
   of how much (or worse, how little) work they do and irrespective of the
   quality of their representation. We make no claim to being able to
   identify the "right" amount of compensation in particular cases. But
   the evidence before us is clear that the perception as to how lawyers
   in class action cases are compensated is often distorted. When there is
   a public reaction to an attorney fee award in a given case, the public
   is usually unaware of what the lawyers actually did, what risks they
   took, what investment they made, and how important their lawyering was
   to victory for the class.10 The cases that account to some extent for a
   negative public view of some plaintiffs' class action lawyers are those
   in which class members receive in a settlement something perceived to
   be of little value or even a slap in the face of the plaintiffs  e.g.,
   in a case involving a defective product, coupons entitling plaintiffs
   to purchase another product by the same manufacturer at a discount
   while the lawyers seek and obtain what seems to be large sums of
   cash.11 It is beyond the scope of the work of this Task Force to
   identify the most troublesome cases and to comment on the merits of
   particular settlements or other dispositions.12 It is sufficient, we
   think, to note that these cases exist and have an effect on public and
   judicial reactions to class actions. The data that the Task Force has
   reviewed, however, demonstrates that class action cases are not always
   winners, the risks in bringing such actions are often quite real, and
   the cases that are dismissed early in litigation may receive less
   publicity than those that settle with money changing 10 For example, a
   study of class actions in four federal districts, conducted by the
   Federal Judicial Center, rendered results that "did not show recurring
   situations where (b)(3) class actions produced minimal benefits in
   relation to attorneys' fees." The study noted some cases in which "the
   settlement produced relatively small payments to the class as well as
   to attorneys for the class." Thomas E. Willging, Laural L. Hooper &
   Robert J. Niemic, EMPIRICAL STUDY OF CLASS ACTIONS IN FOUR FEDERAL
   DISTRICT COURTS 77 (Federal Judicial Center 1996). 11 See, e.g., In re
   General Motors Corp. Pick-Up Truck Fuel Tank Prods. Liab. Litig., 55
   F.3d 768 (3d Cir. 1995), where the original settlement called for class
   counsel to receive attorney fees in the amount of $9.5 million, and
   class members received no more than a $1,000 certificate towards a GM
   truck. 12 It is worth noting that many of the concerns about coupon
   settlements can be alleviated by basing counsel fees on the value of
   coupons actually redeemed, rather than the theoretical value of coupons
   awarded. Statement of Brian Wolfman, submitted to the Task Force, at
   14-15 ("[B]y tying counsel's fate to that of their clients, the typical
   coupon settlement would become a thing of the past, and only
   settlements in which the coupon has a cash redemption value or the
   settlement includes the participation of a secondary market-maker  in
   other words, a settlement that actually broadly benefits the class
   would be worth counsel's efforts."). 5 hands. The larger the sum in a
   settlement or judgment, the more interest various press entities have
   in reporting and commenting on it.13 D. Appointing Counsel and Awarding
   Reasonable Attorney Fees For more than a quarter century, lawyers have
   competed to control common fund financial recovery class action
   litigation. Much of the time they work out among themselves a voluntary
   plan to allocate responsibility, often referred to as "private
   ordering." In other cases, however, judges must decide who should speak
   for the plaintiffs and serve as lead counsel. In both scenarios, the
   court has the obligation to decide who should represent the plaintiff
   class, either by reviewing counsel's private arrangements or by
   choosing among competing counsel. The court's decision may reward some
   counsel and disappoint others. Until the 1990s, the choice of lead
   counsel in common fund cases was either left to the plaintiffs' lawyers
   to work out voluntarily, subject to the approval of the court (which
   was likely to follow), or to a decision by the court based on the
   court's judgment as to who could most adequately represent the class.
   Two recent innovations concerning appointment of class counsel have
   created controversy and gave rise to the appointment of this Task
   Force. First, some judges have experimented with conducting an auction
   as a way of choosing lead counsel. Simply put, these judges asked
   lawyers who wanted to serve as lead counsel to submit a bid as to what
   they would require by way of fees and expenses. As this Report will
   demonstrate, bidding has taken various forms and utilized a number of
   different measures. Second, Congress enacted the Private Securities
   Litigation Reform Act in 1995. This Act created the concept of the
   "most adequate" plaintiff and envisioned that this lead plaintiff14
   would choose counsel for the class, subject to review by the court. The
   Act raises a number of questions, including the degree to which a court
   should defer to the lead plaintiff's choice of counsel and 13 Although
   we are unaware of any scientific study of the matter, the Task Force
   believes that most nonlawyers are unaware of many of the risks faced by
   lawyers who take on and assume responsibility for class actions. There
   often is substantial publicity of successful class actions, and the
   focus of the publicity will naturally be on the amount of the recovery
   if it is large. Large recoveries get public attention, and large
   recoveries often result in substantial attorneys' fees that also
   attract attention. When class actions are dismissed, the publicity is
   often sparse or nonexistent, and the fact that class lawyers are
   uncompensated is often not understood. Motions to dismiss on the
   pleadings are not big news, although they are common in a number of
   class action scenarios. 14 Outside of securities cases and the PSLRA,
   the concept of "lead plaintiff" is a familiar one. We shall use the
   term "lead plaintiff" as synonymous with the "most adequate plaintiff"
   in discussing securities class actions. 6 whether a court-sponsored
   auction is permissible in securities class actions. As will become
   evident as we proceed, the Task Force found it impossible to separate
   three basic questions: 1. How to choose lead counsel? 2. How to
   compensate lead counsel? 3. When to make the compensation decision? The
   reason these questions are interrelated is that the case for bidding is
   an argument for reducing attorney fees and for ex ante as opposed to ex
   post determination of fees and expenses. Similarly, one argument for
   deferring to the lead plaintiff's choice of counsel in securities class
   actions is the assumption that the empowered plaintiff will be willing
   and able to control attorney fees and expenses. The Task Force's
   deliberations on the fundamental questions of appointment, fees and
   timing were informed by the professional responsibility questions
   presented by the management of class actions.15 In class actions, the
   ordinary assumptions about the attorney-client relationship do not 15
   Throughout this Report, we cite to the applicable sections of the ABA
   Model Rules of Professional Conduct ("Model Rules"). These rules form
   the basis of the professional rules of the majority of the states.
   Stephen Gillers & Roy D. Simon, REGULATION OF LAWYERS STATUTES AND
   STANDARDS, p. xxiii (2001) ("As of Fall, 1999, more than 40 states and
   the District of Colombia had adopted all or a significant portion of
   the Model Rules."). In 1997, the ABA appointed the Ethics 2000
   Commission ("Ethics 2000"), to recommend changes and to update the
   Model Rules. The recommendations of Ethics 2000 are available at
   http://www.abanet.org/cpr/ethics2k.html . Ethics 2000 has submitted its
   Final Report to the ABA House of Delegates, which is in the process of
   considering its recommendations. CONFERENCE REPORT ABA ANNUAL MEETING,
   17 ABA/BNA LAWYERS' MANUAL ON PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT 492 (August 15,
   2001). Whatever the outcome in the ABA House of Delegates, the states
   are free to adopt or reject Ethics 2000 recommendations. Those
   proposals adopted by the ABA are likely to become the most influential.
   Pertinent recommendations of Ethics 2000 will also be referred to in
   this Report. Several states retain all or parts of the ABA Model Code
   of Professional Responsibility ("Model Code"), which was the
   predecessor to the Model Rules. Pertinent provisions of the Model Code
   will be cited in this Report. In 2000, the ALI published the
   RESTATEMENT OF LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS. A product of 14 years of work,
   the Restatement is likely to become influential on many topics.
   Pertinent provisions of the Restatement are also included in this
   Report. Whatever the specific articulation, the core values comprising
   the responsibilities of lawyers are the same. Pertinent to the Task
   Force's inquiry, lawyers owe clients duties of loyalty, dedication, and
   competence and are prohibited from charging unreasonable fees. (Other
   core values include duties of communication and confidentiality, which
   are not directly implicated here.) 7 apply. In other types of
   litigation, clients may be counted on to manage the litigation, because
   they are naturally involved and concerned. Moreover those clients are
   paying counsels' bills, either out of their pockets as the case goes
   along or out of their recovery at the conclusion of the case. For those
   reasons, clients can be expected to act in their own interest to
   monitor the litigation and to assess the reasonableness of the lawyers'
   fee. Client involvement is the primary means by which the attorney's
   core responsibilities of diligence16, loyalty17, and competence18 are
   monitored and a reasonable fee negotiated. This is the structure
   envisioned by the professional responsibility rules, which mandate that
   the attorney communicate the material facts to the client to enable the
   client to make informed decisions about the representation19 and
   provide that it is the client's decision that governs the objectives of
   the representation.20 The general model of client involvement also
   assures 16 Model Rule 1.3 (Comment 1: "A lawyer should act with
   commitment and dedication to the interests of the client and zeal in
   advocacy upon the client's behalf."); Model Code DR6- 101(A)(1)( A
   lawyer shall not handle a matter "which he knows or should know that he
   is not competent to handle . . ."); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING
   LAWYERS § 52 (Comment c "The lawyer must perform tasks reasonably
   appropriate to the representation including, where appropriate, inquiry
   into the facts, analysis of law, exercise of professional judgment,
   communication with the client, rendering of practical and ethical
   advice, and drafting of documents."). 17 Model Rule 1.7 (Comment 1:
   "Loyalty is an essential element in the lawyer's relationship to a
   client."); Model Code EC 5-1 ("The professional judgment of a lawyer
   should be exercised, within the bounds of the law, solely for the
   benefit of his client and free of compromising influences and
   loyalties. Neither his personal interests, the interests of other
   clients, nor the desires of third persons should be permitted to dilute
   his loyalty to his client."); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS
   § 121 (Comment b."[T]he law seeks to assure clients that their lawyers
   will represent them with undivided loyalty. A client is entitled to be
   represented by a lawyer whom the client can trust."). 18 Model Rule 1.1
   ("Competent representation requires the legal knowledge, skill,
   thoroughness and preparation reasonably necessary for the
   representation."); Model Code EC 6- 1 ("Because of his vital role in
   the legal process, a lawyer should act with competence and proper care
   in representing clients."); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS §
   52 (Comment b) (the duty of competence is "the skill and knowledge
   normally possessed by members of that trade or profession in good
   standing."). 19 Model Rule 1.4 (b)("A lawyer shall explain a matter to
   the extent reasonably necessary to permit the client to make informed
   decisions regarding the representation."); Model Code EC 7-8 ( a lawyer
   "should exercise his best efforts to insure that decisions of his
   client are made only after the client has been informed of relevant
   considerations."); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS § 20. 20
   Model Rule 1.2(a) ("A lawyer shall abide by a client's decisions
   concerning the objectives of representation . . "); Model Code EC 7-7 (
   "In certain areas of legal representation 8 that the client has the
   power to hire and fire the lawyer and to make decisions about
   settlement. 21 The Rules also require attorney fees to be reasonable.22
   In class actions, most members of the class do not participate in
   retaining counsel or in negotiating the representation arrangements.
   Class members are usually geographically dispersed. Ordinarily, class
   counsel is not even personally acquainted with most members of the
   class. Moreover, because the common fund class action is designed to
   pool a number of small claims, many members of the class do not know
   and may not care about the litigation. There are lead plaintiffs in all
   class action cases, and theoretically these lead plaintiffs could
   monitor the performance of their counsel. But, often a lead plaintiff
   has only a small stake in the litigation and lacks the resources,
   sophistication or interest to engage in monitoring. In these
   circumstances, the ordinary relationship between lawyer and client
   cannot be relied on to safeguard the interests of the class.23 Counsel
   for a class is in a unique position. Absent class members are not
   individual clients. Thus, the ordinary attorney-client relationship
   does not exist between each class member and class counsel. Yet, there
   clearly is a duty imposed upon class counsel  by the rules of
   professional conduct and by Fed. R. Civ. P. 23  to protect the entire
   class fairly and adequately and to work not affecting the merits of the
   cause . . . , a lawyer is entitled to make decisions on his own. But
   otherwise the authority to make decisions is exclusively that of the
   client . . ."); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS §§ 21, 22
   (permitting the lawyer and client to alter by agreement the usual
   allocation of decisionmaking responsibility). 21 Model Rule 1.2(c),
   Comment 5 ("The client may not be asked to agree to representation so
   limited in scope as to violate [the duty to perform competently], or to
   surrender the right to terminate the lawyer's services or the right to
   settle litigation that the lawyer might wish to continue."); Model Code
   EC 7-7 ( "[I]t is for the client to decide whether he will accept a
   settlement offer . . ."). 22 Model Rule 1.5(a) ("A lawyer's fee shall
   be reasonable."); Model Code DR 2-106(A) & (B) (A lawyer "shall not
   enter into an agreement for, charge, or collect an illegal or clearly
   excessive fee." A fee is "clearly excessive when, . . . a lawyer of
   ordinary prudence would be left with a definite and firm conviction
   that the fee is in excess of a reasonable fee."). Ethics 2000 would
   amend Rule 1.5 to provide that an attorney be precluded from charging
   unreasonable amounts for expenses as well as fees. See also ABA Formal
   Opinion 93-379 (holding that the Rule 1.5 "reasonableness" standard
   also applies to expenses). 23 Randall S. Thomas and Robert G. Hansen,
   Auctioning Class Action and Derivative Lawsuits: A Critical Analysis,
   87 NW. U. L. REV. 423 , 433 (1993) ("Despite the strictures of the
   received legal model of the attorney-client relationship, the
   plaintiffs' attorney, not the plaintiffs, in these actions, controls
   the conduct of every important aspect of the litigation. . . .
   Individual plaintiffs cannot, by themselves, effectively control the
   agency costs that arise from the attorney- client relationship in these
   cases."). 9 diligently to maximize class recovery. The goal of all the
   procedures surrounding the appointment of class counsel and the setting
   of fees is to establish appropriate structures and monitoring
   mechanisms to substitute for the ordinary attorney-client relationship
   and to assure performance of the fiduciary responsibilities owed by
   both the lawyer and the lead plaintiff to the class. An overriding
   concern for the Task Force was to provide recommendations that enhance
   and support professional behavior by class counsel and that reduce or
   minimize conflicts between the interests of class counsel and the
   interests of the class. The Task Force has examined the various ways
   that class action counsel are selected  voluntary agreements among
   plaintiffs' counsel ratified by the court; judicial selection of lead
   counsel by the court; judicial deference to an empowered plaintiff's
   choice of counsel; and auctions. We have become increasingly aware that
   no method of selection is beyond criticism, none assures the "right"
   amount of compensation to counsel, none guarantees maximum recovery for
   class members, and none eliminates the possibility of conflicts of
   interest between counsel and the class. Each of the methods of
   selection might end up with the best counsel being selected and paid
   the fairest price, but none assures this result and there is no readily
   available mechanism to evaluate the success or failure of a selection
   method. Voluntary agreements among plaintiffs' counsel with judicial
   approval may lead to selection of the best lawyers, and judicial
   oversight of fee applications at the conclusion of the case may offer a
   theoretically perfect opportunity for setting the "right" fee in light
   of all that has occurred. But, voluntary agreements among lawyers may
   create cartel-like groupings that favor some lawyers and disfavor
   others on the basis of factors that have little to do with ability or
   fees, and such agreements may also result in overstaffing and padded
   hours. In order to reach a "deal", lead counsel may have to "cut in" so
   many lawyers that the representation of the class becomes inefficient
   and the ultimate fee request becomes inflated.24 Judicial selection of
   lead counsel may reflect a judge's past experience with certain lawyers
   and may not permit all competitors to compete on an even playing field.
   Review of fee applications at the conclusion of the case may be
   theoretically perfect, but realistically the judge may be hard-pressed
   to assess the risks as perceived ex ante, the difficulty of the case,
   and the 24 See John C. Coffee, The Regulation of Entrepreneurial
   Litigation: Balancing Fairness and Efficiency in the Large Class
   Action, 54 U. CHI. L. REV. 877, 907 (1987) (observing that under
   private ordering, competing groups have sometimes invited other
   attorneys into the action in order to secure their vote for lead
   counsel, and that the result of some private ordering is a "political
   compromise," the price of which is "often both overstaffing and an
   acceptance of the free-riding or marginally competent attorney, whose
   vote gave him leverage that his ability did not."). See also In re
   Milestone Sci. Sec. Litig., 187 F.R.D. 165, 175 (D.N.J. 1999) (noting
   that a "litigation by committee" approach to securities class actions
   may prove wasteful and harmful to the class). But see In re Oxford
   Health Plans, Inc. Sec. Litig, 182 F.R.D. 42, 46 (S.D.N.Y. 1998)
   (noting the benefits of pooling the resources of multiple counsel "in
   order to support what could prove to be a costly and time-consuming
   litigation"). 10 benefits provided by counsel.25 The judge may also
   have a difficult time determining the reasonableness of a fee request
   in the absence of a real adversarial testing after a settlement has
   been reached. Judicial deference to the choice of counsel by a
   sophisticated, empowered lead plaintiff might result in selection of
   the best firm on the best conditions, or it might confirm the
   politically charged "pay-to-play" regime that is said to exist in some
   places. A bidding system might identify lawyers who appear savvy about
   a case and who are willing to seek less in fees than other lawyers, but
   it might instead result in an underestimation or overestimation of the
   value of a case ex ante that threatens to impair the lawyer's incentive
   and ability to carry the case forward effectively under the
   stipulations set forth in the bid. Some scholars have proposed other
   mechanisms designed to eliminate or reduce the agency problem that
   arises when class action lawyers represent class action plaintiffs, but
   for each proposed solution there are major problems. One such proposal
   is to auction class claims to the highest bidder. The Task Force finds
   that proposal to be unworkable in practice.26 An auction of claims
   would currently violate rules of professional conduct prohibiting
   lawyers from having a financial interest in the client's claim,27 and
   would require changes in the law that have not yet garnered support
   outside of some academic circles. In view of the thus-far purely
   academic nature of the debate, the Task Force focused its attention on
   the bidding process for lead counsel, which actually has generated some
   judicial as well as academic support.28 25 See, e.g., In re Synthroid
   Marketing Litig., 264 F.3d 712, 719 (7th Cir. 2001) ("Only ex ante can
   bargaining occur in the shadow of the litigation's uncertainty; only ex
   ante can the costs and benefits of particular systems and risk
   multipliers be assessed intelligently."). 26 See Jonathan R. Macey and
   Geoffrey P. Miller, The Plaintiffs' Attorney's Role in Class Action and
   Derivative Litigation: Economic Analysis and Recommendations for
   Reform, 58 U. CHI. L. REV. 1 (1991) (proposing auctions of class action
   claims); Randall S. Thomas and Robert G. Hansen, Auctioning Class
   Action and Derivative Lawsuits: A Critical Analysis, 87 NW. U. L. REV.
   423 (1993) (criticizing Miller and Macey proposal as unworkable in
   practice, and questionable under the current rules of professional
   responsibility); Statement of Professor Samuel Issacharoff, submitted
   to the Task Force, at 6 (noting that the size of the class claims at
   stake render it unlikely that they could be purchased by a plaintiff's
   firm, and that the only realistic prospective bidders would be the
   defendants or their insurers, leading to the problem "of the class
   created through the contrivance of the defendant, rather than through
   the adversarial process."). 27 See Model Rule 1.8(j) and Model Code DR
   5-103(A) (both prohibiting a lawyer from acquiring a proprietary
   interest in the cause of action). 28 The Task Force familiarized itself
   with the literature on auctioning of claims and made a decision not to
   discuss in this Report the question whether it thought that auctions of
   claims might make sense in certain kinds of cases. As noted in the
   text, auctioning of claims would require changes in the law that as yet
   appear highly unlikely to be made. Indeed, if auctions of 11 It is with
   the view that we operate in an imperfect world that the Task Force
   presents its report. We seek neither to identify one way to choose lead
   counsel in all cases nor to discourage experimentation in appropriate
   cases. Our goal is to identify factors that judges, counsel and
   plaintiffs might think about as they consider how to choose counsel in
   common fund class action cases and how the choice relates to the method
   of compensating chosen counsel and the timing of the compensation
   decision. claims were seriously considered by lawmakers, it might well
   make sense to begin slowly with auctions of single, as opposed to
   class, claims. The issues that arise in auctions of claims differ from
   those that arise when bidding for lead counsel occurs. This Report will
   demonstrate that auctions of lead counsel raise a number of issues that
   require careful analysis. We chose to confine ourselves to that
   analysis and to leave for the future and for others the subject of the
   possibility, let alone the desirability, of auctioning class claims. 12
   II. The Task Force and Its Methodology Chief Judge Becker established
   the Task Force on Selection of Class Counsel to evaluate the emerging
   practice of several distinguished district court judges throughout the
   country of selecting class counsel through a judicially-conducted
   auction process, as well as the subject of selection of class counsel
   in general. In his charge to the Task Force, he stated that while
   auctions seemed to result in lower transaction costs and therefore
   greater benefits to the class, there were many judges and lawyers who
   believed that the process was "deeply flawed." Judge Becker stressed
   the importance of assisting courts, especially new judges, in
   determining how to proceed with appointment and compensation of counsel
   in class actions. The Task Force was asked to report its tentative
   recommendations at the 2001 Third Circuit Judicial Conference. Because
   the problem of appointment of class counsel confronts every federal
   court in the country, the Task Force's membership was not limited to
   judges and attorneys within the Third Circuit. Indeed, one of the
   reasons for forming the group was to learn from experience outside the
   Third Circuit. The Task Force was co-chaired by Professor Stephen A.
   Saltzburg of George Washington University Law School and Gregory P.
   Joseph, Esq., of New York City. The Task Force was composed of current
   and former federal judges; the Chancellor of the Delaware Court of
   Chancery; lawyers in varied areas of practice, including plaintiff's
   class action, class action defense, and in- house corporate
   representation; and an academic who has done significant scholarly work
   on class actions. Professor Daniel J. Capra of Fordham Law School
   served as the Reporter to the Task Force; Professor Eleanor W. Myers of
   Temple Law School served as Associate Reporter. Ms. Toby D. Slawsky,
   Circuit Executive, Third Circuit Court of Appeals, provided invaluable
   assistance to the Task Force. Judith F. Ambler served as Research
   Assistant. In addition, the work of the Task Force was aided
   considerably by research conducted by Laural Hooper and Marie Leary of
   the Federal Judicial Center.29 The Task Force formulated a
   comprehensive list of questions on which it sought and received public
   comment. Those questions are as follows: 1. Auction of class counsel
   appointment as an alternative to traditional appointment a. Does
   auctioning tend to create a better result for class members than
   traditional appointment? Or do the lower attorney fees associated with
   the auctioning cases correspond to a proportionately lower recovery for
   the class? 29 The Task Force expresses its thanks to the Federal
   Judicial Center and its Director, Judge Fern M. Smith, for the
   invaluable assistance provided to the work of the Task Force. The
   Report prepared for the Task Force by Laural Hooper and Marie Leary,
   Auctioning the Role of Class Counsel in Class Action Cases: A
   Descriptive Study (Federal Judicial Center 2001) ("FJC Report"), posted
   on the Task Force website at www.ca3.uscourts.gov. 13 b. The lodestar
   formula has been criticized for providing an incentive for class
   counsel to expend unnecessary hours, sometimes with the permission or
   even encouragement of the defendant. Is there any empirical evidence to
   indicate that such an incentive is operating? Does auctioning reduce
   that incentive? Does it instead create a contrary incentive to settle
   the claim at the earliest possible opportunity? c. Why isn't the
   judge's ability to set the fee at the end of the case sufficient to
   address all issues that bidding is used to address? d. Does the auction
   process unfairly benefit large firms over small firms? e. Does the
   auction process discourage plaintiff's attorneys from conducting a
   thorough pre-complaint investigation? Will lawyers invest money to work
   up class actions if there is a significant risk that they will not be
   selected as counsel for the class? f. It has been suggested that one
   benefit of an auction is that it allows firms that have not previously
   had the opportunity to serve as lead counsel to do so. Is there any
   evidence to indicate that this has happened or are the same firms
   continually winning the bidding process?g. Are the costs associated
   with traditional appointment of class counsel (e.g., ex post fee
   determinations) eliminated or reduced by auctioning? h. What costs are
   imposed by auctioning? (e.g., determining the value of the claim ex
   ante, scrutinizing bids, etc.) i. Are the costs associated with
   auctioning greater or less than those associated with traditional
   appointment? j. How does the timing of the initial counsel selection
   decision (well prior to Rule 23 certification) affect the propriety or
   appropriateness of auctioning? Is the judge too invested in the
   up-front selection if auctioning is used? 2. Professional
   responsibility questions a. Which procedure, auction or traditional
   appointment, better promotes counsel's loyalty to the class by aligning
   the interests of class counsel with those of the class? b. Some winning
   bids have included caps on fees or costs. Do these caps affect
   counsel's independent judgment on behalf of the class? c. Some winning
   bids have included a promise not to take a fee if the settlement is
   below a certain number. Does this arrangement create a conflict of
   interest for class counsel? d. How might the auction procedure be
   structured to best preserve class counsel's independence and loyalty on
   behalf of the class? e. Are there other professional responsibility
   concerns raised specifically by the auction procedure? 3. Auction
   procedures and implementation a. Assuming that auctioning is a viable
   alternative to traditional appointment, is it more appropriate in some
   circumstances than others (e.g., antitrust actions, mass tort actions,
   small claimant actions)? Should there be different procedures for
   different types of cases? Are there some kinds of cases in which
   auctioning is never appropriate? For example, if the contemplated
   recovery is something other than money (e.g., equitable relief,
   coupons, ADR), would an auction procedure be unworkable? 14 b. What
   considerations other than price, if any, should the court take into
   account in awarding the appointment? Should the court attempt to
   replicate the considerations that a client would take into account in
   addition to price, e.g., experience, financial resources, etc.? If so,
   how? c. How should court and counsel obtain enough information about
   the claim to determine its value for bidding purposes? d. Should a
   court consider the degree of concentration in the market of class
   counsel? Should it be an objective of the bidding process to expand the
   field of attorneys who serve as lead counsel? e. Is there evidence of
   collusion or incentives to collusion in the auctioning process? If so,
   should procedures be employed to prevent collusion? If so, what
   procedures should be used? f. What are the advantages or disadvantages
   of the following features of auction procedure? i. Sealed bids; ii.
   Disclosure of the terms of the winning bid; iii. Permitting or
   prohibiting bids from a consortium of firms; iv. Caps on expenses; v.
   Caps on the fee; vi. Modification of caps at the time of the fee award;
   vii. Structuring the bids, e.g., according to stage of the litigation;
   viii. Use of an X factor, i.e., a figure below which 100% of the amount
   of recovery goes to the class; ix. Use of rising, falling or straight
   percentages as the basis for auctioning; x. Permitting certain bidding
   counsel to have a right to match the best bid; g. How does the court
   determine whether the winning bid is "too good", i.e., such a "good
   deal" for the class that it raises a question about counsel's
   qualifications or ability to assess the case? h. Should the court
   compensate lawyers who conduct the initial investigation and file the
   initial complaint if they do not win the auction? i. Are any special
   considerations necessary for "coattail" or "follow-on" class actions?
   j. Should the appointment of lead counsel go to a single lawyer or a
   single law firm? 4. Auctioning of class counsel and the Private
   Securities Litigation Reform Act a. Is auctioning class counsel
   consistent with the lead plaintiff provision of the Private Securities
   Litigation Reform Act? How much deference should the court give to the
   presumptive lead plaintiff's choice of counsel? b. If the auction is
   won by counsel other than one chosen by the lead plaintiff, should or
   must the court accommodate the lead plaintiff's choice of counsel? For
   example, should lead plaintiff's counsel have a right of first refusal
   on the bid? 5. Suggested procedures for traditional appointment of
   class counsel a. What procedures can be suggested for improving the
   traditional process of 15 appointing class counsel? 6. Other solutions
   a. Can the "empowered plaintiff" rationale of the PSLRA be applied to
   other kinds of class actions, so that appointment should be left in the
   hands of the plaintiff with the greatest stake in the action? b.
   Academics have suggested an auction of claims as opposed to an auction
   of class counsel. See, e.g., Macey and Miller, The Plaintiffs'
   Attorney's Role in Class Action and Derivative Litigation: Economic
   Analysis and Recommendations for Reform, 58 U. CHI. L. REV. 1 (1991).
   Is this a viable option? If so, should the defendant be permitted to
   bid? 7. Related questions a. Do derivative actions pose special
   questions for appointment of counsel by the auction procedure? b. Does
   the use of steering committees create any special problems or concerns
   respecting the auction procedure? ____________________ The Task Force
   took three days of testimony from judges, lawyers and academics on the
   subject of appointment of class counsel, with an emphasis on the
   propriety and workability of auctions and the viability of auctions
   under the PSLRA. Witnesses at the hearings included federal judges who
   have conducted auctions for class counsel; a federal judge who chairs
   the subcommittee responsible for preparing the proposed amendments to
   Rule 23; academics who have published extensively on class actions
   generally and on auctions in particular; lawyers who represent
   institutional investors; lawyers who represent plaintiffs in class
   actions; lawyers who represent defendants in class actions; lawyers who
   represent public interest organizations; and a researcher for the
   Federal Judicial Center with extensive expertise in class actions. Most
   of these witnesses supplied written statements for the benefit of the
   Task Force; a number of non-witnesses supplied written statements as
   well.30 The Task Force met formally on six occasions to exchange views
   and comment on drafts. Drafts were revised in accordance with the
   consensus of Task Force members at these meetings. In its
   deliberations, the Task Force evaluated the witness statements,
   testimony at the hearings, the 30 All written statements of the
   witnesses submitted to the Task Force are available on the Third
   Circuit website at www.ca3.uscourts.gov. They can be found
   alphabetically by the name of the person who submitted the statement.
   The statements submitted to the Task Force are referred to throughout
   this Report as "Statements submitted to the Task Force," as
   distinguished from the actual testimony before the Task Force. The
   testimony before the Task Force is posted separately on the Third
   Circuit website. Citations to "Testimony" throughout this report refer
   to testimony at the Task Force hearings. 16 pertinent case law,
   academic scholarship, and empirical research on appointment of counsel
   and fee awards in class actions. The Task Force also relied heavily on
   the factual information prepared by the Federal Judicial Center
   concerning the cases in which auctions have been used. A draft of the
   Task Force report was prepared for discussion at the Third Circuit
   Judicial Conference. The draft report was the subject of a lively and
   enlightening exchange of ideas by three panels of judges, lawyers and
   academics respectively. The comments received at the Judicial
   Conference were most helpful to the Task Force in highlighting possible
   problems and inaccuracies in the draft report. In addition, the Task
   Force invited public comment on the draft report and received a number
   of extensive and insightful comments. The Task Force considered all of
   the comments made at the Conference and submitted by the public, and
   made a number of changes to the draft report in light of those
   comments. The result is this final report on selection of counsel in
   class actions.31 31 Two of the judges with the most experience with
   auctioning class counsel, Judge Milton I. Shadur and Judge Vaughn R.
   Walker, participated extensively in the Third Circuit Judicial
   Conference discussions. Each pointed out perceived failings in the Task
   Force's draft report. Each took the time after the Conference to submit
   extensive written comments, which are posted on the Third Circuit web
   site. Their willingness to engage on the subject, to invest time to
   assist us in our effort, and their obvious dedication to and concern
   for the interests of individuals and entities who depend on our
   judicial system for justice is much appreciated. While we may disagree
   in this Final Report with some of their views, we have enormous respect
   for the intellectual commitment they have given to our work. Nothing in
   this Report should be construed as criticism of any of the auctions
   that they or any other judge has conducted, or of the results in any
   particular case. In the hands of some judges, procedures that might
   seem problematic as a general matter work well. The Task Force examined
   the concept of auctioning class counsel with an eye to how the auction
   process would work if used routinely by district judges. Our goal is to
   point out the advantages and disadvantages of various selection options
   in order to assist judges in making their choice of the option that
   they believe will work best in particular cases. 17 III. Summary and
   Recommendations This Report analyzes the bid or auction method of
   choosing class counsel and contrasts it with other methods of counsel
   selection.32 Because the question of appointment of counsel is
   intimately tied to the question of fee awards, the Report also analyzes
   procedures used by courts in awarding counsel fees in class actions.
   The Report evaluates the auction process in comparison to more
   traditional methods and makes recommendations on best practices for
   selection of class counsel, monitoring class litigation, and awarding
   counsel fees. The Task Force unanimously makes the following
   conclusions and recommendations: 1. Auctioning class counsel represents
   a creative and energetic innovation, and the Task Force hesitates to
   restrict the use of new initiatives at such an early stage of their
   development. However, the risks and complications associated with a
   judicially- controlled auction counsel against its use except under
   certain limited circumstances described in greater detail in this
   Report. 2. The paradigmatic case in which an auction might be
   considered is one in which the defendants' liability appears clear
   (often as the result of a governmental investigation or an admission of
   the defendants); the damages appear to be both very large and
   collectible (thus ensuring a significant number of competing bids); and
   the lead plaintiff is not a sophisticated litigant that has already
   retained counsel of its choice through a reasonable, arm's-length
   process.33 Even in a seemingly paradigmatic case, however, there still
   remains uncertainty based on the limited record before the Task Force
   that 32 Judge Leonard I. Garth invited the Task Force's attention to
   the effect of an arbitration demand by a class member on class action
   certification and settlement. In re Cendant Corp. Litig., 2001 WL
   487903 (3d Cir. 2001) (Garth, J., dissenting), vacated on grant of
   rehearing en banc, June 5, 2001: Indeed, just recently this Court has
   announced the formation of a Task Force on selection of class counsel
   and has enumerated a number of issues for the Task Force to consider. I
   suggest that this question of arbitration-class certification is one
   which in my opinion should assume prominence in the Task Force's
   labors. The Task Force did not understand that Judge Becker's charge
   fairly included this question and therefore, respectfully, considered
   it to be outside its jurisdiction. 33 The Task Force, in Section X,
   supra, provides recommendations for appropriate procedures to be used
   in those cases in which an auction might be considered. 18 the auction
   process will maximize net class recovery and ensure the best
   representation for the class. It has yet to be established that the
   auction process will save judicial time and resources, given the
   dictates of Fed.R.Civ.P. 23 and the emerging case law holding that the
   use of an auction ex ante does not relieve the court of its duty ex
   post to review the reasonableness of fees sought by class counsel. 3.
   The traditional methods of selecting class counsel, with significant
   reliance on private ordering, are preferable to auctions in most class
   action cases. In using those traditional methods, however, the court
   must guard against overstaffing by lawyer groups. 4. Auctions are
   inconsistent with the goal of the PSLRA, which is to assure that the
   "most adequate" plaintiff will choose counsel and negotiate a
   reasonable fee. The PSLRA mandates that class actions are to be
   client-driven, not court-driven. To the extent that an auction is even
   permissible under the PSLRA, it should be conducted only if the lead
   plaintiff's choice of counsel, or process in choosing counsel, is so
   infirm as to rebut the presumption that the plaintiff is "most
   adequate" under the statute, and then only if the alternative
   candidates for the "most adequate plaintiff" are not willing or able to
   engage in a meaningful search for and negotiation with counsel. 5.
   Although some ex ante guidance to class counsel is desirable, Rule 23
   ultimately requires the court to examine the fairness of the fees
   requested by counsel at the conclusion of the case. Thus, at best the
   benefits of auctions appear speculative, except that they might over
   time provide the courts with an additional source of data for
   determining what fees are reasonable in class actions. A percentage
   fee, tailored to the realities of the particular case, remains superior
   to any other means of determining a reasonable fee for class counsel.
   In setting a percentage fee, the court should avoid rigid adherence to
   a "benchmark." 6. Courts should require public institutional investors
   seeking appointment as lead plaintiffs to disclose whether chosen
   counsel has made contributions to the campaign of any public officials
   who have authority or substantial influence over the institutional
   decisionmaker. 19 IV. Problems Arising From Appointment of Counsel In
   Common Fund Class Actions A. Traditional Methods of Appointment and
   Awarding of Fees The common fund class action can alter the traditional
   attorney-client relationship, in which an individual client has a
   sufficient stake in the outcome to choose counsel, agree to
   compensation, and monitor counsel's conduct. Where the traditional
   client controls are absent, courts are left to oversee appointment of
   the lead plaintiff and lead counsel and compensation of class counsel.
   The Judge has a continuing obligation under Fed.R.Civ.P. 23 to assure
   that counsel can and does adequately represent the class, and that
   counsel fees are reasonable. In deciding on appointment, courts in
   class actions have traditionally exercised case-by-case discretion,
   often relying on competing counsel to work out an arrangement, also
   known as private ordering 34 Where counsel cannot agree, or where
   courts have raised substantial questions about the way that private
   ordering has worked out in a particular case, courts have then engaged
   in a qualitative analysis to choose counsel, framed by the experience,
   knowledge and discretion of the particular judge. 34 The Delaware
   Courts rely heavily on private ordering. A description of that process
   is set forth in the Statements of R. Franklin Balotti and Joseph
   Rosenthal, submitted to the Task Force. See also TCW Technology Limited
   Partnership v. Intermedia Communications, Inc., 2000 WL 1654504
   (Del.Ch.) ("Traditionally, the Court of Chancery has allowed counsel
   representing individual, class or derivative plaintiffs to engage in a
   type of private ordering, that is, to coordinate prosecution of the
   litigation and to propose the most efficient means of consolidation.").
   Many federal courts have recognized a preference for private ordering
   as well. See, e.g., In re Continental Illinois Securities Litig., 572
   F. Supp. 931, 935 (N.D. Ill. 1983) ("In the event a class is certified,
   I would prefer to designate counsel who are nominated by plaintiffs'
   attorneys. I therefore suggest that plaintiffs' counsel confer together
   with a view toward submitting a proposed roster that will be no larger
   than necessary to provide effective representation . . ."). 20 In
   deciding on fees, courts have traditionally considered a fee
   application at the end of the class action. Two different formulas have
   been used: lodestar35 and percentage of recovery.36 Both methods have
   encountered criticism. The lodestar method requires a calculation of
   the hours spent in conducting the litigation, multiplied by an
   appropriate hourly rate, and adjusted, if appropriate, by a multiplier
   factor for quality and risk. The lodestar approach is problematic
   because it encourages the expenditure of hours, and so can lead to
   class lawyers running up the bill.37 The lodestar also may create
   incentives for counsel to postpone an early settlement that would favor
   the class, in order to bill more hours.38 Thus, the lodestar does not
   necessarily align the interests of counsel with the interests of the
   class. Finally, a court using the lodestar method must expend valuable
   judicial time and resources to 35 The Third Circuit has described the
   lodestar method as follows: A court determines an attorney's lodestar
   award by multiplying the number of hours he or she reasonably worked on
   a client's case by a reasonable hourly billing rate for such services
   given the geographical area, the nature of the services provided, and
   the experience of the lawyer. Gunter v. Ridgewood Energy Corp., 223
   F.3d 190, 195 n.1 (3d Cir. 2000). 36 The Third Circuit has stated that
   the percentage of recovery method "resembles a contingent fee in that
   it awards counsel a variable percentage of the amount recovered for the
   class." In re General Motors Trucks, 55 F.3d 768, 819 n.38 (3d Cir.
   1995). 37 See Goldberger v. Integrated Resources, 209 F.3d 43, 48 (2d
   Cir. 2000) (noting that the lodestar creates "a temptation for lawyers
   to run up the number of hours for which they could be paid.") See also
   Howard M. Downs, Federal Class Actions: Diminished Protection for the
   Class and the Case for Reform, 73 NEB. L. REV. 646, 667 (1994) (noting
   that under the lodestar method attorneys can "pad their hours and
   otherwise engage in unethical activities to enhance their fees");
   Kirchoff v. Flynn, 786 F.2d 320 (7th Cir. 1986) (observing that the
   lodestar method creates an incentive to run up hours). 38 Court Awarded
   Attorney Fees, Report of the Third Circuit Task Force, 108 F. R. D.
   237, 248 (1985) (the lodestar approach "creates a disincentive for the
   early settlement of cases" because of the emphasis on hours worked;
   "there appears to be a conscious, or perhaps unconscious, desire to
   keep the litigation alive despite a reasonable prospect of settlement,
   to maximize the number of hours to be included in computing the
   lodestar."). See also Goldberger v. Integrated Resources, 209 F.3d 43,
   48 (2d Cir. 2000) (noting that the lodestar "created an unanticipated
   disincentive to early settlements."); Statement of Professor Arthur
   Miller, submitted to the Task Force, at 3 ("The lodestar method also
   can create unfortunate incentives for a plaintiff's lawyer to engage in
   unnecessary work to prolong the litigation in an effort to justify a
   larger fee, which, of course, causes inefficiency, inhibits settlement,
   and misaligns the interests of counsel and class."). 21 undertake a
   detailed review of expense sheets and billing records, because the
   judge will have to determine whether the hours claimed were reasonable
   in relation to the action.39 The percentage of recovery method has
   received its share of criticism as well  at least when applied by
   courts in an automatic fashion. If courts simply apply a "standard"
   percentage no matter what, they risk awarding windfall recoveries to
   lawyers in some cases and denying reasonable compensation in others.40
   If applied in a by-rote fashion, the percentage of recovery method can
   justly be criticized as arbitrary.41 It has also been argued that
   percentage fee awards may create incentives for counsel to settle
   early, when working to obtain a higher settlement or going to trial
   would cost more than counsel is likely to recover in a percentage, even
   if the overall recovery after a later settlement or trial might be more
   advantageous to the class.42 A more general complaint about the
   traditional method of determining fees in class actions is that there
   is sometimes no adversarial testing of counsel's fee submission. In a
   common fund case, 39 See, e.g., Goldberger v. Integrated Resources, 209
   F.3d 43, 48 (2d Cir. 2000) (noting that the "primary source of
   dissatisfaction" with the lodestar "was that it resurrected the ghost
   of Ebenezer Scrooge, compelling district courts to engage in a
   gimlet-eyed review of line-item fee audits" resulting in "an inevitable
   waste of judicial resources"); Skelton v. General Motors, 860 F.2d 250
   (7th Cir. 1988) (noting the administrative difficulties imposed by the
   lodestar method). See also Court Awarded Attorney Fees, Report of the
   Third Circuit Task Force, 108 F.R.D. at 246 (criticizing lodestar
   approach as unduly burdensome on the judiciary). 40 See Thomas E.
   Willging, Laural L. Hooper and Robert J. Niemic, EMPIRICAL STUDY OF
   CLASS ACTIONS IN FOUR FEDERAL DISTRICT COURTS at 71 (Federal Judicial
   Center 1996) (noting the problem of using a percentage of recovery
   method that is not case-sensitive). See also Martha Pacold, Attorneys'
   Fees in Class Actions Governed by Fee-Shifting Statutes, 68 U. CHI. L.
   REV. 1007, 1021 (2001) ("In the 1970s, many courts began to view the
   percentage method as problematic because it generated windfalls for
   attorneys in cases with exceptionally large funds. Some courts avoided
   this problem by reducing the percentage awarded. However, this exposed
   the method to criticism as unprincipled."). 41 See, e.g., Gunter v.
   Ridgewood Energy Corp., 223 F. 3d 190 (3d Cir. 2000), which remanded a
   percentage fee award for redetermination by the District Court because
   the fee opinion was too "cursory and conclusory" to be adequately
   reviewed. See also In re Quintus Securities Litigation, 148 F. Supp.2d
   967, 974 (N.D. Cal. 2001) (criticizing the automatic award of a
   "benchmark" percentage). 42 In re Auction Houses Antitrust Litig., 197
   F.R.D. 71, 77 (S.D.N.Y. 2000); Statement of Arlin M. Adams, submitted
   to the Task Force, at 10 (noting that percentage of recovery method may
   create incentives for counsel to "cut corners"; lawyers "may settle too
   early, because they may prefer to spend relatively few hours (and thus
   maximize the amount they are paid per hour), rather than spend more
   time and increase the plaintiff's recovery."). 22 the defendant has
   little incentive to contest the award because the fee will come from
   the amount the defendant has already agreed to pay.43 So unless a class
   objector appears to contest the fee request, the judge does not have
   the benefit of an adversary's views. B. The Auction Innovation
   Frustrated with the difficulties of lodestar and percentage of recovery
   methods utilized at the end of the case, some courts have begun to
   experiment with an auction method of selecting class counsel relatively
   early in the case.44 Under the auction method, firms seeking
   appointment as lead counsel submit bids to the court proposing a fee
   structure for conducting the litigation. The court uses the bids, and
   any other information it considers relevant, to select lead counsel.
   Lead counsel is awarded to the qualified firm submitting the best bid.
   By selecting a "winning" bid, the court simultaneously selects lead
   counsel and determines counsel's fee. Courts have resorted to auctions
   for at least two reasons. First, an auction has been thought to be an
   effective way to replicate the market process by which a client chooses
   and negotiates a fee agreement with counsel outside the class action
   context.45 Second, some judges conducting an auction have found it to
   be a device that helps to assure those judges that the fiduciary
   obligations of lead plaintiffs are fulfilled. 43 Statement of Arlin M.
   Adams, submitted to the Task Force, at 4 (when fees are determined at
   the end of the action, "the adversary process breaks down, because
   defendants are eager to settle the case and those in the class often
   lack the incentive or means to mount a serious challenge to an award of
   fees."); Statement of Professor Joseph A. Grundfest, submitted to the
   Task Force, at 7 ("The defendant could care less about the size of the
   fee because the defendant's obligation to fund the pool is fixed by the
   settlement, and a lower fee award therefore would not provide any
   benefit to the defendant. . . . The absent class members are rationally
   apathetic and have no cause to object."); Statement of Brian Wolfman,
   submitted to the Task Force, at 17 ("Indeed, class counsel often
   negotiate `clear sailing' arrangements, where the defendant agrees not
   to contest a fee up to a certain amount, the very purpose of which is
   to eliminate an adversary contest regarding fees."). 44 The first judge
   to utilize an auction was Judge Vaughn R.Walker in In re Oracle
   Securities Litig., 131 F.R. D. 688, 698 (N.D. Cal. 1990). 45 See In re
   Oracle Securities Litig., 131 F.R.D. 688, 693 n.12 (N.D. Cal. 1990)
   (explaining that the use of an auction would "make use of the
   mechanisms of a competitive market"). 23 There are substantial
   questions raised by the auction process, however, including whether the
   class is best served by selecting the counsel who offers the lowest bid
   (even if the court includes qualitative factors in its determination);
   whether a court can replicate a client's choice without becoming unduly
   involved in the selection and negotiation process; and whether a
   meaningful fee agreement can be reached in advance of the case, when
   the judge remains bound under Rule 23 to review the fee at the end of
   the case.46 Additionally, there are substantial legal questions whether
   the auction procedure is consistent with the PSLRA, which requires the
   court to appoint as lead plaintiff the "most adequate plaintiff,"47 who
   is presumed to be the person or group with the largest financial stake,
   and to permit that lead plaintiff to select counsel, subject to court
   approval.48 C. Professional Responsibility Concerns Professional
   responsibility concerns are at the heart of the issues surrounding the
   selection of class counsel, in an auction or otherwise. Ordinarily, the
   fiduciary relationship between client and lawyer is the method by which
   the lawyer's loyalty,49 competence,50 and dedication51 to the client's
   cause are assured. "The relationship between lawyer and client is at
   the core of the law of lawyering. . . . Although it is true that
   lawyers owe duties to third persons who are not clients, to courts and
   other 46 See, e.g. In re Cendant Corp. Prides Litig., 243 F.3d 722, 734
   (3d Cir. 2001) ("A preliminary bidding process cannot replace
   subsequent analysis . . . the circumstances and progression of every
   case are different, and these unique factors must be taken into account
   by district courts awarding attorney's fees. Therefore, though the
   result of a bidding process may be of use to a district court in
   awarding fees at the end of the case, it cannot supplant post
   settlement analysis to determine a reasonable fee.") 4715 U.S.C.§
   78u-4(a)(3)(B). 48In re Razorfish, Inc. Securities Litig., 143 F. Supp.
   2d 304, 311 (S.D.N.Y. 2001) (finding that under the PSLRA the primary
   focus is on choosing the lead plaintiff and then deferring to that
   plaintiff's choice of counsel). 49 Model Rule 1.7(b) ("A lawyer shall
   not represent a client if the representation of that client may be
   materially limited by the lawyer's responsibilities to . . . a third
   person or . . . a lawyer's own interests."). 50 Model Rule 1.1 ("A
   lawyer shall provide competent representation to a client."). 51 Model
   Rule 1.3. ("A lawyer shall act with reasonable diligence and promptness
   in representing a client."). Lawyers also owe clients duties of
   communication (Model Rule 1.4) and confidentiality (Model Rule 1.6). 24
   tribunals, and to the legal system and the law generally, the most
   basic duties run to clients."52 There is a preference for
   client-centered relationships even when clients are not fully capable
   of assuming the client role because of competence or other
   disabilities.53 Moreover, where a client is not competent and it is in
   the client's best interest, lawyers are encouraged to see that a client
   representative is appointed.54 In class action litigation, it is widely
   acknowledged that plaintiffs' generally small financial stakes, wide
   dispersion, disorganization, inadequate knowledge and lack of interest
   often combine to make the ordinary presumptions about client-monitored
   litigation unrealistic.55 A fundamental premise of American
   adjudicative structures is that clients, not their counsel, define
   litigation objectives. Thus [the professional responsibility rules]
   emphasize that an attorney must defer to the client's wishes on matters
   affecting the merits of legal action. 52 Geoffrey C. Hazard & W.
   William Hodes, THE LAW OF LAWYERING §2.1 (3d ed. 2001) (observing that
   the Model Rules reverse the common reference to the "lawyer-client"
   relationship, referring instead to the "client-lawyer" relationship to
   emphasize the primacy of the client's interests). 53 Model Rule 1.14:
   "When a client's ability to make adequately considered decisions . . .
   is impaired, . . . the lawyer shall as far as reasonably possible,
   maintain a normal client-lawyer relationship with the client.";
   RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS, § 24. 54 Model Rule 1.14;
   RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS, § 24(4). 55 Jill E. Fisch,
   Aggregation, Auctions, and Other Developments in the Selection of Lead
   Counsel under the PSLRA, 64 LAW AND CONTEMP. PROBS. 53 ("Although the
   group [of plaintiffs] may have a large financial interest in the
   aggregate, the small individual stakes reduce the likelihood that group
   members will participate actively in the litigation process."); Randall
   S. Thomas & Robert G. Hansen, Auctioning Class Action and Derivative
   Lawsuits: A Critical Analysis, 87 NW. U. L. REV. 423, 433 (1993) ("Our
   analysis of the agency costs inherent in class action . . . lawsuits
   conflicts with the received legal model of the attorney-client
   relationship. This model presumes that the attorney is the agent of the
   client. Under the profession's ethics rules, the attorney has a duty to
   advance the client's interest to the furthest extent permissible.
   Clients are to keep watch over their attorneys using monitoring
   devices, bonding mechanisms, and incentive structures. . . . Despite
   the strictures of the received legal model of the attorney- client
   relationship, the plaintiffs' attorney, not the plaintiffs, in these
   actions controls the conduct of every important aspect of the
   litigation."); Jonathan R. Macey & Geoffrey P. Miller, The Plaintiffs'
   Attorney's Role in Class Action and Derivative Litigaion: Economic
   Analysis and Recommendations for Reform, 58 U. CHI. L. REV. 1, 20
   (1991) (noting that class counsel operates essentially unregulated by
   clients); RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS § 14 Comment f.
   ("Members of the class often lack the incentive or knowledge to monitor
   the performance of class representatives."). 25 However, by
   presupposing an individual client with clearly identifiable views,
   these codes elide a frequent and fundamental difficulty in class action
   proceedings. In many such cases, the lawyer represents an aggregation
   of litigants with unstable, inchoate, or conflicting preferences. The
   more diffuse and divided the class, the greater the problems in
   defining its objectives.56 In the absence of the usual attorney-client
   relationship, alternative structures and methods for managing class
   actions have developed. Traditionally, class counsel's professionalism
   has been left to the lawyers' own commitment to professional
   obligations,57 with court oversight over the prosecution of the action
   and the lawyer's fee.58 Recently, the judicial auction process was
   devised, 56 Deborah L. Rhode, Class Conflicts in Class Actions, 34
   STAN. L. REV. 1183 (1982). See also In re Cendant Corp. Litig., 264
   F.3d 201 at 254 (3d Cir. 2001): Lawyers operate under ethical rules
   that require them to serve only their clients' interests. When a
   representation involves a single client, the ability to select, retain,
   and monitor counsel gives clients reason to be confident that their
   lawyers will live up to their obligation. The power to select counsel
   lets clients choose lawyers with whom they are comfortable and in whose
   ability and integrity they have confidence. Most of the safeguards we
   have described vanish in the class action context, where "the client"
   is a sizable, often far-flung group. Logistical and coordination
   problems invariably preclude class members from meeting and agreeing on
   anything, and, in all events, most class members generally lack the
   economic incentive or sophistication to take an active role. 57 See
   generally Model Rule 1.7 and Model Rule 5.2(a) ("A lawyer is bound by
   the rules of professional conduct notwithstanding that the lawyer acted
   at the direction of another person."); Greenfield v. Villager
   Industries, Inc., 483 F.2d 824, 832 (3d Cir. 1973) ("[I]n addition to
   the normal obligations of an officer of the court, and as counsel to
   parties to the litigation, class action counsel possess, in a very real
   sense, fiduciary obligations to those not before the court."). 58 In re
   Cendant Corp. Litig., 264 F3d 201 at 255 (3d Cir. 2001) (in the absence
   of effective client oversight and because there are inherent conflicts
   of interest between counsel and the class, the court is traditionally
   the agent designated to oversee the relationship between counsel and
   the class.). The Task Force notes that class actions are not the only
   situations in which judges are called on to oversee counsel's fidelity
   to clients. Cases in which the client is a trustee or fiduciary,
   guardianships over infants or the mentally incompetent, bankruptcy and
   the purchase of legal services by governmental units to litigate on
   behalf of the public are other situations in which the court is called
   on to be the primary monitor of counsel's activity and fee. Geoffrey C.
   Hazard & W. William Hodes, THE LAW OF LAWYERING, § 8.7 (3d ed. 2001)
   ("In several recurring 26 in part, to compensate for the absence of a
   meaningful client- lawyer relationship in certain types of class
   actions, and in an attempt to assure that the lead plaintiff's
   fiduciary obligations to the class are fulfilled. In essence, the
   auction process substitutes a judge-centered process for the
   traditional client- centered process. The question that the Task Force
   considered is whether this extensive judicial involvement, at the
   outset of the case, creates more problems than it solves. The ethical
   concerns at the heart of judicial auctions involve the lawyer's duty of
   loyalty to the class,59 and the relationship between that duty and the
   setting of reasonable attorney fees. Lawyers are not permitted to
   represent clients if there is a material limitation on their
   responsibilities to their clients arising from their own personal or
   financial interests.60 The size of potential fees in class actions and
   the absence of meaningful client oversight combine to present
   particular conflict of interest concerns in class actions, that may not
   arise in traditional attorney-client relationships.61 situations,
   courts increase the rigor of their scrutiny. . . . When the lawyers'
   client is a trustee or other fiduciary, for example, the fee that the
   client pays will be charged against the estate or other res that is the
   subject of the proceedings and thus will effectively be borne by the
   beneficiary. . . . On this rationale, heightened scrutiny of the
   reasonableness of attorneys fees is routine in trust and estate
   administration, guardianships over infants and the mentally
   incompetent, as well as in bankruptcy proceedings. . . . Class action
   litigation provides another example of built-in enhanced scrutiny of
   attorney fees."). Accordingly, judges are called on to develop methods
   and procedures to safeguard client interests in a variety of
   situations, in addition to the class action cases that are the focus of
   this Report. 59 In re Auction Houses Antitrust Litig., 197 F.R.D. 71,
   75 (S.D.N.Y. 2001) ("[T]he class action mechanism is not free of
   problems, foremost among them for purposes of this case, difficulties
   in obtaining counsel who will manage the case efficiently and
   effectively on behalf of the class and the mismatch of economic
   incentives between the plaintiff class and its attorney."); Statement
   of Prof. Samuel Issacharoff, submitted to the Task Force, at 3 ("[T]he
   central issue is therefore the determination of which manner of
   selecting and compensating class counsel best attracts skillful lawyers
   and then best structures the incentives for faithful representation of
   the class.") 60 A Comment to Model Rule 1.5 states: "A [fee] agreement
   may not be made whose terms might induce the lawyer improperly to
   curtail services for a client or perform them in a way contrary to a
   client's interest." This Comment recognizes the possibility that fee
   agreements may influence the lawyer's loyalty to a client. 61 See In re
   Cendant Corp. Litig., 264 F.3d 201 at 254-55 (3d Cir. 2001) ("[A]
   rational self-interested client seeks to maximize net recovery; he or
   she wants the representation to terminate when his or her gross
   recovery minus his or her counsel fee is the largest. In contrast, at
   least in theory and often in practice, a rational self-interested
   lawyer looks to maximize his or her net fee, and thus wants the
   representation to end at the moment when the difference between 27 The
   Model Rules of Professional Conduct, like its predecessor the Model
   Code, requires that attorney fees be reasonable.62 Among the factors to
   be considered in determining reasonableness are: the time, labor and
   skill required; the novelty and difficulty of the work; fees
   customarily charged for similar services; the amount involved and the
   results obtained; the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer,
   and whether the fee is fixed or contingent.63 Judicial auctions were
   devised in part to foster greater loyalty by counsel to the class and
   to award reasonable fees, by setting fees up front and creating
   structures that were intended to maximize attorney incentives to work
   faithfully and diligently, while minimizing the conflicts which
   characterized the alternatives. A central question for the Task Force
   was whether judicial auctions, in fact, reduced the potential conflicts
   between the class and counsel or whether they exchanged one set of
   potential conflicts for another. While the professional rules center on
   client relationships, they also presuppose that lawyers retain core
   fiduciary obligations, which exist outside client control. The
   attorney-client relationship is premised on general agency principles,
   which require the agent's fidelity to the principal's interest,
   particularly in situations where the principal may be unable to monitor
   the agent's conduct.64 Many of the Rules require adherence to
   professional obligation irrespective of the client's ability to monitor
   the lawyer's behavior and even in situations where the client might be
   willing to consent to a his or her net fee and costs . . . is the
   greatest. These two points rarely converge. As a result there is often
   a conflict between the economic interests of clients and their lawyers,
   and this fact creates reason to fear that class counsel will be highly
   imperfect agents for the class."). 62 Model Rule 1.5(a); Model Code
   DR2-106(A)&(B). 63 Under the recommendations by the ABA's Ethics 2000
   Commission, Model Rule 1.5 would be amended to preclude lawyers from
   charging an unreasonable amount for expenses as well as fees. See also
   ABA Formal Opinion. 93-379 (holding that the Rule 1.5 "reasonableness"
   standard also applies to expenses). 64 Jonathan R. Macey & Geoffrey P.
   Miller, The Plaintiffs' Attorney's Role in Class Action and Derivative
   Litigation: Economic Analysis and Recommendations for Reform, 58 U.
   CHI. L. REV. 1, 20 (1991) (describing the agency problems presented by
   class actions.) 28 modification of the obligation.65 Thus, clients may
   not consent to the payment of unreasonable fees66 or contingency fees
   in certain situations,67 nor may clients consent to representation by a
   single lawyer in all situations.68 In class actions, for example,
   lawyers may be not be able to represent all class members, if the
   interests of some class members diverge materially from others, even
   though the class representatives may consent.69 65RESTATEMENT OF THE
   LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS, Ch. 2, Introductory Note ("A lawyer is an agent,
   to whom clients entrust matters, property, and information, which may
   be of great importance and sensitivity, and whose work is usually not
   subject to detailed client supervision because of its complexity.
   Because those characteristics of the client-lawyer relationship make
   clients vulnerable to harm, and because of the importance to the legal
   system of faithful representation, the law stated [in the Restatement]
   provides a number of safeguards for clients beyond those generally
   provided to principals."). 66 Geoffrey C. Hazard & W. William Hodes,
   THE LAW OF LAWYERING, §8.6, pp. 8-15 (3d ed. 2001) ("This focus on
   procedural requirements [in Model Rule 1.5], however, should not
   obscure the fact that contingent fee agreements must also satisfy the
   threshold substantive requirement of reasonableness."); RESTATEMENT OF
   LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS § 34 ("A lawyer may not charge a fee that is
   larger than is reasonable in the circumstances. . . .") 67 Model Rule
   1.5(d) prohibits contingent fees in criminal and domestic relations
   matters. RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS §35 is similar. 68
   Model Rule 1.7, the general rule governing loyalty and conflicts of
   interest, provides that a lawyer may not seek a client's consent for a
   representation that may materially limit the lawyer's responsibilities
   to that client unless "the lawyer reasonably believes the
   representation will not be adversely affected." Model Rule 1.7(b)(2).
   Ethics 2000 proposed a change in the form of this Rule but not its
   substance. A new comment to Rule 1.7 is proposed which elaborates on
   the idea of non-consentable conflicts of interest: "The proposed Rule
   makes clear that in certain situations a conflict may not be waived by
   the client. That is, the representation may not go forward even with
   the client's consent. . . . This standard is set forth in a separate
   paragraph, both to reflect the separate steps required in analyzing
   conflicts (i.e., first identify potentially impermissible conflicts,
   then determine if the representation is permissible with the client's
   consent) and to highlight the fact that not all conflicts are
   consentable;" RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS § 122 (2)(c)
   ("Notwithstanding the informed consent of each affected client or
   former client, a lawyer may not represent a client if . . . in the
   circumstances, it is not reasonably likely that the lawyer will be able
   to provide adequate representation to one or more of the clients."). 69
   RESTATEMENT OF THE LAW GOVERNING LAWYERS § 122, Comment g (iv) and §
   128 d(iii). See generally, Lazy Oil v. Witco, 166 F. 3d 581, 588 (3d
   Cir.1999) (suggesting that a strict reading of the conflict of interest
   rules in class actions should be tempered, because the very nature of a
   class action is to combine many divergent interests.). 29 The
   professional responsibility rules acknowledge that the complexity and
   technical nature of lawyers' work may preclude effective client
   monitoring, even in non-class action settings. Lawyers nevertheless
   retain core responsibilities to be faithful and dedicated fiduciaries
   to client interests. Ultimately clients must rely on the character and
   integrity of their lawyers to fulfill those responsibilities. The Task
   Force notes that many witnesses referred to the professionalism of
   individual lawyers as important to a client's choice of counsel, and
   others emphasized the motivation of lawyers to achieve good results for
   clients regardless of their own interests.70 It is important that
   whatever approach is taken to selection and compensation of class
   counsel, there must be judicial review. Rule 23 requires, and logic
   supports, a review at the conclusion of a case  at a minimum to examine
   whether counsel met fiduciary obligations and performed at the level
   expected when the case began. Even if one concludes that an ex ante
   bidding process is advantageous, it is difficult to believe in the
   class action context that one would abolish a final look at the
   attorneys' work at the conclusion of the case. Professionalism is
   assumed, but there are failures in class actions as in every other part
   of life. Thus, the Task Force assumed that lawyers would meet
   professional standards , but that there could be failures and that
   there must be a final review in class actions by the court. Also the
   class, as well as counsel, will feel more satisfied if there is closure
   through a court order on the question of fees. In its deliberations,
   the Task Force evaluated alternative structures for managing class
   actions with the goal of encouraging a lawyer's adherence to
   professional obligations. Its recommendations on judicial auctions
   arise, in part, from a perception that the auction procedure is not
   well-suited to appraising the intangible quality of lawyer
   professionalism.71 The Task Force concluded that 70 Testimony of
   Lawrence A. Sucharow, June 1, 2001, p. 138-39 (" I only know that in
   all my years of practice, I have understood what a fiduciary duty is,
   and I tried to carry that out. . . I believe that most, the vast
   majority of counsel and courts understand what fiduciary duties are and
   carry them out in connection with class actions."); Testimony of H.
   Laddie Montague, June 1, 2001 p. 153-154 ("There is a real feeling of
   doing good and when we get into cases, we really take up the [cudgels]
   for the principals. . . . Is it a case that will redress a wrong that
   otherwise might not be made?"); Statement of Horace Schow II, submitted
   to the Task Force, at 3 ("Legal services are not a commodity. The
   quality of counsel, their reputation and experience in the field,
   knowledge of [the client], and their openness to negotiating with us on
   a fee structure appropriate to the case as we assess it at the outset,
   are all factors to be considered together [ when retaining counsel]".).
   71 Statement of Sherrie R. Savett, submitted to the Task Force, at 9
   ("Experience, resources, and other factors such as accessability,
   demeanor, reputation, etc. are all elements that an individual client
   takes into consideration in selecting an attorney. It is exceptionally
   difficult for a court to take these factors into consideration when
   conducting an auction. One cannot easily quantify an unquantifiable
   element.") 30 procedures that enhanced client control and emphasized
   the experience, wisdom and judgment of the bench were generally
   superior to judicially-controlled auctions.72 72 Testimony of Prof.
   Arthur R. Miller, June 1, 2001, p. 196 ( "I love judicial discretion. I
   know some judges on the courts of appeal . .. . want to rein that
   discretion in but I think one of the beauties of the Unites States
   district judge is his or her discretion."); Testimony of Hon. Louis C.
   Bechtle, June 1, 2001, p. 121 ("I don't agree totally with Judge
   Kaplan's assertion that a percentage [attorney's fee recovery] is out
   of the air. Percentages come from years and years of experience and
   history in these cases."). 31 V. The Auction Cases A. Courts Using the
   Auction Process The idea of an auction process was first raised and
   employed by Judge Vaughn R. Walker in In re Oracle Securities
   Litigation.73 As of September, 2001, according to research conducted by
   the 73 131 F.R.D. 688 (N.D. Cal. 1990); 132 F.R.D. 538 (N.D. Cal.
   1990); 136 F.R.D. 639 (N.D. Cal 1991). 32 Federal Judicial Center, only
   seven federal judges had utilized auctions in a total of 14 cases.74
   Thus 74 See Laural L. Hooper and Marie Leary, Auctioning the Role of
   Class Counsel in Class Action Cases: A Descriptive Study (Federal
   Judicial Center 2001). The auction cases cited and analyzed by the FJC
   are: In re Oracle Securities. Litig., 131 F.R.D. 688 (N.D. Cal. 1990));
   In re Wells Fargo Securities. Litig., 157 F.R.D. 467 (N.D. Cal. 1994);
   In re Amino Acid Lysine Antitrust Litig., 918 F. Supp 1190 (N.D. Ill.
   1996); In re California Micro Devices Securities Litig., 168 F.R.D. 257
   (N.D. Cal. 1996); In re Cendant Corp. Litig., 182 F.R.D. 144 (D.N.J.
   1998), rev'd, 264 F.3d 201 (3d Cir. 2001); In re Network Assocs. Inc.,
   Securities Litig., 76 F. Supp. 2d 1017 (N.D. Cal. 1999); Sherleigh
   Assocs. LLC v. Windmere-Durable Holdings, Inc., 184 F.R.D. 688 (S.D.
   Fla. 1999); In re Lucent Techs. Inc. Securities. Litig., 194 F.R.D. 137
   (D.N.J. 2000); In re Bank One Shareholders Class Actions, 96 F. Supp.
   2d 780 (N.D. Ill. 2000); Wenderhold v. Cylink Corp., 188 F.R.D. 577
   (N.D. Cal. 1999); In re Auction Houses Antitrust Litig., 197 F.R.D. 71
   (S.D.N.Y. 2001); In re Quintus Securities Litig., 148 F. Supp.2d 967,
   986- 87 (N.D. Cal. 2001); In re Commtouch Software Ltd. Securities
   Litig., No. 01-C-00719, Order Re Lead Plaintiff Selection and Class
   Counsel Selection (N.D. Cal. June 27, 2001); In re Comdisco Securities
   Litig., 141 F. Supp. 2d 951 (N.D. Ill. 2001). The Judges who have used
   the auction procedure are: Judge Vaughn R. Walker, Northern District of
   California (five cases); Judge Milton I. Shadur, Northern District of
   Illinois (three cases); Judge William H. Alsup, Northern District of
   California (two cases); Judge Alfred J. Lechner, Jr., District of New
   Jersey (twice in In re Lucent); Judge William A. Walls, District of New
   Jersey (one case); Judge Joan A. Lenard, Southern District of Florida
   (one case); and Judge Lewis A. Kaplan, Southern District of New York
   (one case). The Report by the Federal Judicial Center, supra, lists and
   provides details on all of the cases in which an auction process has
   been used to date. The FJC Report indicates that the number of cases in
   which courts considered conducting an auction but rejected the idea
   "remains unknown." FJC Report, at 4. Fred B. Burnside, in "Go Pick a
   Client  And Other Tales of Woe Resulting From the Selection of Class
   Counsel by Court-Ordered Competitive Bidding (unpublished manuscript,
   on file with the Task Force), states that after the Oracle decision
   "the overwhelming majority of courts have not adopted competitive
   bidding" and cites the following cases in which bidding was considered
   but rejected: Cooperman v. Powell, No. 91-37-FR, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS
   4941, at*4*5 (D. Or.); Davis v. Coopers & Lybrand, No. 90-C-7173, 1991
   U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10384, at *12*13 (N.D. Ill.); In re In-Store
   Advertising Securities. Litig., Civ. No. 90-5594 (S.D.N.Y. 1990); In re
   Computer Assocs. Int'l, Inc. Securities. Litig., No. CV-90-2394, et al.
   (E.D.N.Y. 1990); In re Software Toolworks, Inc. Securities Litig.,
   Master File No. CA 90-3191-FMS (N.D. Cal. 1990); Sutton v. MarchFirst,
   Inc., 00-C-6676 (N.D. Ill. Feb. 7, 2001) (minute order provides for
   counsel to submit fee agreement to court, but implicitly rejects
   earlier suggestion of defendants to adopt competitive bidding by not
   doing so); In re AT&T Corp. Sec. Litig., Civ. No. 00-5364 (GEB) (D.N.J.
   Jan. 29, 2001) (appointing the New Hampshire Group as lead plaintiff
   over defendant's suggestion of competitive bidding); Rosenberg v.
   Nationsbanc Montgomery Sec. Inc., No. C-98- 20956 RMW (N.D. Cal. 1998)
   (appointing lead counsel without resorting to bidding despite the
   request in prior pleadings of one group of plaintiffs to auction off
   lead counsel position); In re 33 it is fair to state that the method of
   auctioning class counsel is at the experimental stage.75 As the FJC
   Report indicates, the judges who have employed auctioning have
   ordinarily done so in an attempt to replicate through competition the
   market that usually exists when a client outside the class action
   context chooses a lawyer.76 In some cases, the court has seemed to
   believe that private ordering has not worked out and that counsel were
   actively competing before the court for the appointment.77 In other
   cases, it appears that the court believed that counsel was controlling
   the prospective class plaintiff rather than the other way around, a
   phenomenon that might be in conflict with the fiduciary obligation of
   the lead plaintiff to select a diligent and effective class counsel.78
   And in still others, courts seem to have gravitated toward auctions
   simply because they believed that they represent a better and more
   efficient process than traditional appointment.79 IBP, Inc. Securities
   Litig., 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7898 (D. S.D.); In re Diamond Multimedia
   Sys. Securities Litig., 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21558 (N.D. Cal.); In re
   Aronson v. McKesson HBOC, Inc., 79 F. Supp. 2d 1146 (N.D. Cal. 1999);
   Sakhrani v. Brightpoint, 78 F. Supp. 2d 845, 854 (S.D. Ind. 1999)
   (rejecting the suggestion for an open competition for lead counsel
   because "the court is satisfied based on prior submissions that the two
   proposed lead firms can represent a proposed class effectively"); In re
   Critical Path Sec. Litig., CV-01-0551 (WHO), 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS
   11481 (N.D. Cal.); In re Calico Commerce, 01-CV-3221, Hearing
   Transcript at 11-17 (S.D. N.Y. June 12, 2001). 75 See Jill E. Fisch,
   Aggregations, Auctions and Other Developments in the Selection of Lead
   Counsel Under the PSLRA, 64 LAW & CONTEMP. PROBS. 53, 82 (2001) ("Lead
   counsel auctions remain a work in progress. Judicial experience with
   the auction process is limited, and few cases utilizing an auction have
   progressed to a stage in which it is possible to evaluate the
   result."); Statement of Guy Miller Struve on behalf of the Association
   of the Bar of the City of New York, submitted to the Task Force, at 2
   ("The limited base of knowledge cautions us that reaching definitive
   conclusions at this early juncture is a hazardous endeavor."). 76 See
   FJC Report, at 16 ("We found the most common reason judges gave for
   employing bidding was to foster competition among counsel by
   replicating the private marketplace for legal services."). 77 Testimony
   of Judge Vaughn R. Walker, March 16, 2001, p. 38 ff. 78 See, e.g. In re
   Amino Acid Lysine Antitrust Litig., 918 F. Supp. 1190, 1194 (N.D. Ill.
   1996) (noting that the "difficulty comes when a lawyer who is not of
   one's choosing is foisted on one, as is inevitable in the class action
   context."). 79 See, e.g. In re Bank One Shareholders Class Actions, 96
   F. Supp. 2d 780, 785 (N.D. Ill. 2000) ("[T]hat [auction] procedure is
   superior to any alternatives that the caselaw or other authorities have
   entertained."). 34 In In re Auction Houses Antitrust Litigation,80
   Judge Lewis A. Kaplan, in addition to expressing dissatisfaction with
   the results of lawyer-driven litigation, relied on positive indicators
   existing in the case that in his view justified an auction. Judge
   Kaplan identified the following factors as supporting an auction under
   the circumstances: 1. A highly publicized government investigation had
   led to the filing of complaints so that no private firm was required to
   ferret out wrongdoing. 2. The publicity had attracted a large number of
   able plaintiffs' attorneys so the court was reasonably confident that
   there would be a critical mass of bidding counsel. 3. A significant
   amount of information was already available to prove both the
   defendants' liability and the amount of damages to the class. 4. Judge
   Kaplan had already become familiar with the case and therefore could
   assess the settlement value of the claim without substantial up-front
   court costs, and without an appearance that he was prejudging the
   merits in his evaluation of bids.81 As discussed below, the T
